Utah statutes.
31A-2-301.   Special hearing officers, witness and mileage fees.

(1)  If the commissioner considers it necessary because of the technicality or
complexity of the subject, he may appoint a special hearing officer from
outside the department staff and may contract for a reasonable professional
fee for the services.
(2) (a)  In hearings before the commissioner, witness fees and reimbursement
for mileage traveled, if claimed, shall be allowed at the same rate as in
district courts.
(b)  Witness fees and reimbursement for mileage, together with the actual
expense necessarily incurred in securing attendance of witnesses and their
testimony, and the hearing officer's fee and reasonable actual expenses, shall
be paid by the Insurance Department.
(c)  The commissioner shall be reimbursed for these costs as provided in
Section 31A-2-205 if:
(i)  the hearing is incident to an examination for which costs are payable
under Section 31A-2-205; or
(ii)  the commissioner orders the persons involved in the hearing to reimburse
the department for hearing costs, which the commissioner may do if he had
reasonable cause to believe that the order which issued or might have issued
was necessary.
(3)  Whenever the commissioner is reimbursed for costs under this section, the
expenditures shall not be charged against the department budget.
